Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6068.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-53 of the General Laws entitled "Low and Moderate Income
Housing" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-53-14.1. Reporting by municipalities of single-family low- or moderate-income
housing.
(a) The department of housing ("department"), created pursuant to § 42-64.34-1, in concert
with Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation ("corporation"), created pursuant to
§ 42-55-4, shall maintain:
(1) An online database ("database") of rental units and single-family households available
for rent or sale that would be considered low- or moderate-income housing.
(2) A list of people and their email addresses and/or phone numbers who are interested in
renting or purchasing low- or moderate-income housing who have signed up with the department
to receive email or text notices of available units for rent or sale.
(b) Each municipality within the state shall provide the following information to the
department monthly commencing December 31, 2025:
(1) Current, updated information on any known inventory of single-family low- or
moderate-income housing or rental units in existence and/or under construction and available or
soon to be available for purchase or rent; and
(2) The contact person or entity and contact information pertaining to properties available
for purchase or rent.

(c) The department shall provide monthly updates of available housing inventory collected
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section to any person registered pursuant to subsection (a)(2) of
this section by way of email or text to the email address or phone number registered with the
department.
(d) Any developer issued a certificate of occupancy by any city or town for property
considered low- or moderate-income property and any realtor listing a property for rent or sale that
is considered low- or moderate-income property shall provide the location of the property and any
additional information the department may require with the department.
(e) The department shall provide a report to the speaker of the house and senate president
annually by January 31 of the number of single-family low- or moderate-income housing properties
and or rentals in existence and under construction, indexed by municipality, for rent or purchase.
(f) Notice of available statewide rental units and housing collected pursuant to this section
shall be provided monthly to each municipality and municipal housing authority in order to be
made available for public observation in electronic or paper form on site.
(g) The information required by subsection (b) of this section shall be made available to
the public without delay on the department's website by April 2, 2026, and updated monthly
thereafter.
(h) The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out
the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000314
========
LC000314 - Page 2 of 3